Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-171
Salvage branded certificate of title; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 60-171 to 60-177:

(1) Cost of repairs means the estimated or actual retail cost of parts needed to repair a vehicle plus the cost of labor computed by using the hourly labor rate and time allocations for repair that are customary and reasonable. Retail cost of parts and labor rates may be based upon collision estimating manuals or electronic computer estimating systems customarily used in the insurance industry;

(2) Flood damaged means damage to a vehicle resulting from being submerged in water to the point that rising water has reached over the floorboard, has entered the passenger compartment, and has caused damage to any electrical, computerized, or mechanical components. Flood damaged specifically does not apply to a vehicle that an inspection, conducted by an insurance claim representative or a vehicle repairer, indicates:

(a) Has no electrical, computerized, or mechanical components damaged by water; or

(b) Had one or more electrical, computerized, or mechanical components damaged by water and all such damaged components were repaired or replaced;

(3) Late model vehicle means a vehicle which has (a) a manufacturer's model year designation of, or later than, the year in which the vehicle was wrecked, damaged, or destroyed, or any of the six preceding years or (b)(i) in the case of vehicles other than all-terrain vehicles, utility-type vehicles, and minibikes, a retail value of more than ten thousand five hundred dollars until January 1, 2010, and a retail value of more than ten thousand five hundred dollars increased by five hundred dollars every five years thereafter or (ii) in the case of all-terrain vehicles, utility-type vehicles, or minibikes, a retail value of more than one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars until January 1, 2010, and a retail value of more than one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars increased by two hundred fifty dollars every five years thereafter;

(4) Manufacturer buyback means the designation of a vehicle with an alleged nonconformity when the vehicle (a) has been replaced by a manufacturer or (b) has been repurchased by a manufacturer as the result of court judgment, arbitration, or any voluntary agreement entered into between the manufacturer or its agent and a consumer;

(5) Previously salvaged means the designation of a rebuilt or reconstructed vehicle which was previously required to be issued a salvage branded certificate of title and which has been inspected as provided in section 60-146;

(6) Retail value means the actual cash value, fair market value, or retail value of a vehicle as (a) set forth in a current edition of any nationally recognized compilation, including automated data bases, of retail values or (b) determined pursuant to a market survey of comparable vehicles with respect to condition and equipment; and

(7) Salvage means the designation of a vehicle which is:

(a) A late model vehicle which has been wrecked, damaged, or destroyed to the extent that the estimated total cost of repair to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its condition immediately before it was wrecked, damaged, or destroyed and to restore the vehicle to a condition for legal operation, meets or exceeds seventy-five percent of the retail value of the vehicle at the time it was wrecked, damaged, or destroyed; or

(b) Voluntarily designated by the owner of the vehicle as a salvage vehicle by obtaining a salvage branded certificate of title, without respect to the damage to, age of, or value of the vehicle.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 71;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 19;

Laws 2014, LB446, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 32.
April 12, 2018